Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MODIFICATION OF SUBSURFACE TREATMENT SYSTEM RULES REQUIRED.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must amend Minnesota Rules, chapters 7080 to 7083, as applicable, to include a reference to the obligations of inspectors under Minnesota Statutes, section 115.55, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may use the good cause exemption under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), to adopt rules under this section, and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end